Florida, session 2026, SB406.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSection 790.0135, Florida Statutes, is created 13 to read: 14 790.0135âCarrying a weapon or firearm; prohibited 15 locations.â 16 (1)âUnless otherwise authorized by law, a person may not 17 carry a weapon or firearm into: 18 (a)âA place of nuisance as defined in s. 823.05; 19 (b)âA police, sheriff, or highway patrol station; 20 (c)âA detention facility, prison, or jail; 21 (d)âA courthouse; 22 (e)âA courtroom, except that this section does not preclude 23 a judge from carrying a weapon or firearm or determining who 24 will carry a weapon or firearm in his or her courtroom; 25 (f)âA polling place; 26 (g)âA meeting of the governing body of a county, public 27 school district, municipality, or special district; 28 (h)âA meeting of the Legislature or a committee thereof; 29 (i)âA school, college, or professional athletic event not 30 related to firearms; 31 (j)âAn elementary or secondary school facility or 32 administration building; 33 (k)âA career center; 34 (l)âA portion of an establishment licensed to dispense 35 alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, which 36 portion of the establishment is primarily devoted to such 37 purpose; 38 (m)âA college or university facility, unless the person is 39 a registered student, employee, or faculty member of such 40 college or university and the weapon is a stun gun or nonlethal 41 electric weapon or device designed solely for defensive purposes 42 and the weapon does not fire a dart or projectile; 43 (n)âThe inside of the passenger terminal and sterile area 44 of an airport, except that a person is not prohibited from 45 carrying a legal firearm into the terminal which is encased for 46 shipment for purposes of checking such firearm as baggage to be 47 lawfully transported on an aircraft; or 48 (o)âAny place where the carrying of firearms is prohibited 49 by federal law. 50 (2)âThis section does not: 51 (a)âProhibit a person from carrying or storing a firearm in 52 a vehicle for lawful purposes. 53 (b)âModify the terms or conditions of s. 790.251(7). 54 (3)âA person who knowingly and willfully violates this 55 section commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable 56 as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 57 Section 2.âSection 790.013, Florida Statutes, is amended to 58 read: 59 790.013âCarrying of concealed weapons or concealed firearms 60 without a license.âA person who carries a concealed weapon or 61 concealed firearm without a license as authorized under s. 62 790.01(1)(b): 63 (1)âmust carry valid identification at all times when he or 64 she is in actual possession of a concealed weapon or concealed 65 firearm and must display such identification upon demand by a 66 law enforcement officer. A violation of this section subsection 67 is a noncriminal violation punishable by a $25 fine, payable to 68 the clerk of the court. 69 (2)âIs subject to s. 790.06(12) in the same manner as a 70 person who is licensed to carry a concealed weapon or concealed 71 firearm. 72 Section 3.âSubsection (12) of section 790.06, Florida 73 Statutes, is amended to read: 74 790.06âLicense to carry concealed weapon or concealed 75 firearm.â 76 (12)(a)âA license issued under this section does not 77 authorize any person to openly carry a handgun or carry a 78 concealed weapon or concealed firearm into: 79 1.âAny place of nuisance as defined in s. 823.05; 80 2.âAny police, sheriff, or highway patrol station; 81 3.âAny detention facility, prison, or jail; 82 4.âAny courthouse; 83 5.âAny courtroom, except that nothing in this section 84 precludes a judge from carrying a concealed weapon or concealed 85 firearm or determining who will carry a concealed weapon or 86 concealed firearm in his or her courtroom; 87 6.âAny polling place; 88 7.âAny meeting of the governing body of a county, public 89 school district, municipality, or special district; 90 8.âAny meeting of the Legislature or a committee thereof; 91 9.âAny school, college, or professional athletic event not 92 related to firearms; 93 10.âAny elementary or secondary school facility or 94 administration building; 95 11.âAny career center; 96 12.âAny portion of an establishment licensed to dispense 97 alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, which 98 portion of the establishment is primarily devoted to such 99 purpose; 100 13.âAny college or university facility unless the licensee 101 is a registered student, employee, or faculty member of such 102 college or university and the weapon is a stun gun or nonlethal 103 electric weapon or device designed solely for defensive purposes 104 and the weapon does not fire a dart or projectile; 105 14.âThe inside of the passenger terminal and sterile area 106 of any airport, provided that no person shall be prohibited from 107 carrying any legal firearm into the terminal, which firearm is 108 encased for shipment for purposes of checking such firearm as 109 baggage to be lawfully transported on any aircraft; or 110 15.âAny place where the carrying of firearms is prohibited 111 by federal law. 112 (b)âA person licensed under this section is not prohibited 113 from carrying or storing a firearm in a vehicle for lawful 114 purposes. 115 (c)âThis section does not modify the terms or conditions of 116 s. 790.251(7). 117 (d)âAny person who knowingly and willfully violates any 118 provision of this subsection commits a misdemeanor of the second 119 degree, punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 120 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.